dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX - Y 33
SFX - le ilization [^aeiou]le 
SFX - le ilization's [^aeiou]le 
SFX - le ilizations [^aeiou]le 
SFX - y ization [^aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 ization [^aemsy] 
SFX - 0 ization [^i]s 
SFX - e ization [^l]e 
SFX - 0 ization [^u]m 
SFX - e ization [aeiou]le 
SFX - 0 ization [aeiou]y 
SFX - um ization um 
SFX - y ization's [^aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 ization's [^aemsy] 
SFX - 0 ization's [^i]s 
SFX - e ization's [^l]e 
SFX - 0 ization's [^u]m 
SFX - e ization's [aeiou]le 
SFX - 0 ization's [aeiou]y 
SFX - um ization's um 
SFX - y izations [^aeiou]y 
SFX - 0 izations [^aemsy] 
SFX - 0 izations [^i]s 
SFX - e izations [^l]e 
SFX - 0 izations [^u]m 
SFX - e izations [aeiou]le 
SFX - 0 izations [aeiou]y 
SFX - um izations um 
SFX - 0 tization a 
SFX - 0 tization's a 
SFX - 0 tizations a 
SFX - s zation is 
SFX - s zation's is 
SFX - s zations is 
SFX s Y 33
SFX s le iliser [^aeiou]le 
SFX s le iliser's [^aeiou]le 
SFX s le ilisers [^aeiou]le 
SFX s y iser [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 iser [^i]s 
SFX s e iser [^l]e 
SFX s 0 iser [^u]m 
SFX s e iser [aeiou]le 
SFX s 0 iser [aeiou]y 
SFX s um iser um 
SFX s y iser's [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 iser's [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 iser's [^i]s 
SFX s e iser's [^l]e 
SFX s 0 iser's [^u]m 
SFX s e iser's [aeiou]le 
SFX s 0 iser's [aeiou]y 
SFX s um iser's um 
SFX s y isers [^aeiou]y 
SFX s 0 isers [^aemsy] 
SFX s 0 isers [^i]s 
SFX s e isers [^l]e 
SFX s 0 isers [^u]m 
SFX s e isers [aeiou]le 
SFX s 0 isers [aeiou]y 
SFX s um isers um 
SFX s s ser is 
SFX s s ser's is 
SFX s s sers is 
SFX s 0 tiser a 
SFX s 0 tiser's a 
SFX s 0 tisers a 
SFX 9 Y 33
SFX 9 le ilizer [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 le ilizer's [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 le ilizers [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 y izer [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer [^aemsy] 
SFX 9 0 izer [^i]s 
SFX 9 e izer [^l]e 
SFX 9 0 izer [^u]m 
SFX 9 e izer [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 0 izer [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 um izer um 
SFX 9 y izer's [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^aemsy] 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^i]s 
SFX 9 e izer's [^l]e 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^u]m 
SFX 9 e izer's [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 0 izer's [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 um izer's um 
SFX 9 y izers [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izers [^aemsy] 
SFX 9 0 izers [^i]s 
SFX 9 e izers [^l]e 
SFX 9 0 izers [^u]m 
SFX 9 e izers [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 0 izers [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 um izers um 
SFX 9 0 tizer a 
SFX 9 0 tizer's a 
SFX 9 0 tizers a 
SFX 9 s zer is 
SFX 9 s zer's is 
SFX 9 s zers is 
SFX t Y 22
SFX t le ilisability [^aeiou]le 
SFX t le ilisable [^aeiou]le 
SFX t y isability [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isability [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 isability [^i]s 
SFX t e isability [^l]e 
SFX t 0 isability [^u]m 
SFX t e isability [aeiou]le 
SFX t 0 isability [aeiou]y 
SFX t um isability um 
SFX t y isable [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isable [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 isable [^i]s 
SFX t e isable [^l]e 
SFX t 0 isable [^u]m 
SFX t e isable [aeiou]le 
SFX t 0 isable [aeiou]y 
SFX t um isable um 
SFX t s sability is 
SFX t s sable is 
SFX t 0 tisability a 
SFX t 0 tisable a 
SFX + Y 22
SFX + le ilizability [^aeiou]le 
SFX + le ilizable [^aeiou]le 
SFX + y izability [^aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izability [^aemsy] 
SFX + 0 izability [^i]s 
SFX + e izability [^l]e 
SFX + 0 izability [^u]m 
SFX + e izability [aeiou]le 
SFX + 0 izability [aeiou]y 
SFX + um izability um 
SFX + y izable [^aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izable [^aemsy] 
SFX + 0 izable [^i]s 
SFX + e izable [^l]e 
SFX + 0 izable [^u]m 
SFX + e izable [aeiou]le 
SFX + 0 izable [aeiou]y 
SFX + um izable um 
SFX + 0 tizability a 
SFX + 0 tizable a 
SFX + s zability is 
SFX + s zable is 
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's . 
SFX B Y 50
SFX B e ability [^a]te 
SFX B e ability [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX B 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX B 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 ability [v][aeiou]r 
SFX B e able [^a]te 
SFX B e able [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX B 0 able [acegilou]e 
SFX B 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 able [v][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B te bility ate 
SFX B te ble ate 
SFX B 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX B y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 rability [^aeiov][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 rable [^aeiov][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX B 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 7 Y 9
SFX 7 0 able [^acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 able [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 0 able [^cely] 
SFX 7 e able [acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX 7 y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX 7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX g Y 9
SFX g e ability [^acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 ability [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX g 0 ability [^cely] 
SFX g 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX g 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX g y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX g 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX g 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX l Y 9
SFX l e ably [^acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 ably [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX l 0 ably [^cely] 
SFX l 0 ably [acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX l 0 ably [aeiou]y 
SFX l y iably [^aeiou]y 
SFX l 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX l 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX b Y 3
SFX b e ible [^aeiou]e 
SFX b 0 ible [^e] 
SFX b 0 ible [aeiou]e 
SFX L Y 12
SFX L 0 ament m 
SFX L 0 ament's m 
SFX L 0 aments m 
SFX L y iment [^aeiou]y 
SFX L y iment's [^aeiou]y 
SFX L y iments [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment [^my] 
SFX L 0 ment [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment's [^my] 
SFX L 0 ment's [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ments [^my] 
SFX L 0 ments [aeiou]y 
SFX Z Y 32
SFX Z 0 by [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX Z 0 dy [^aegio][aeiou]d
SFX Z 0 ey [aiouy]
SFX Z 0 fy [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX Z 0 gy [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX Z 0 ity ous
SFX Z 0 ky [^adeio][aeiou]c
SFX Z 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX Z 0 ly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX Z 0 my [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX Z 0 ny [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX Z 0 py [^aeior][aeiou]p
SFX Z 0 py r[aeio]p
SFX Z 0 ry [^aegilostmvp][aiou]r
SFX Z 0 ry lur
SFX Z 0 ry tar
SFX Z 0 sy [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX Z 0 ty [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX Z 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX Z 0 y [^aceiglmopt][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz]
SFX Z 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX Z 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX Z e y [^aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprtvz]
SFX Z 0 y [aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 y [gl][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [stmvp]or
SFX Z ic y dic
SFX Z 0 y ged
SFX Z 0 y rup
SFX Z 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z
