dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
abolish/DGLRS
accoutre/LDSG
admire/RGSDkln
adore/lRSnGkD
advance/RDSGLM
afford/DBGSl
Agatha/M
al/b
align/SaDGLA
alphabet/-SW891Mw
alter/dS7
Amazon/MS
amen/dgl7S
analyse/GWSRNB
announce/RDSLG
apology/S89M3
appal/DSGkL
apple-pie/SM
are/B
argue/7DRSG
arm/RELGDS
arthroscope/MSWZ
assess/7LS
Atherington/M
atom/-98MS
atone/SoLDG
attain/lDRBGLS
attract/VuS7DGv
avail/GDSlBM
avoid/RSDGl7
b/pb
Balinese/M
banish/GSLDr
bank/S7RGJMD
bastard/8-MSYZ
bear/SJlRG7Má
beat/MSlRG7J
Bedfont/M
beguile/DRLSGk
bewitch/LDSkG
bioassay/SM7
biocircuit/SM
blotch/SGMZD
Bollywood/M
borrow/RGS7JD
branch/ZDGMSá
bribe/BDRySGM
Bridgewater/M
bulge/ZGDMSk
bureaucrat/1W8SM-
bushido/M	Noun: uncountable
cache/p7DGSMr
canon/wMW-18S3
canton/dMSLO
cape/BDRMlS
carcase/MS
cat/SGDzZ2Má
category/Ow8W9-SM1
certify/Rl7DGnS
chain/Má
change/RBlpGDSM
character/98+dp6-MS
choreograph/ZGRS1DW
clean/MSGYPTRDB~
click/RSGDM7
clunk/DRMGzZS
codeword/SM
coerce/RDbGS
collapse/bSGDM
colon/9MW3-8S
command/RkGDLMS
compare/uVvGBlR
compel/7GSDnk
compute/DRGnlSB
conceal/S7RDkLG
conceptual/-83
condemn/n7RGDS
condense/DRSGbnP
conduct/b
confer/7DgGRS
construct/ASbDG
contact/G7DSMp
contain/7RLDSG
contempt/SbM
contract/DbGM
control/BRMSlGD
controvert/DGSb
convert/RSbDG
convey/D7SG
cope/SMZ
corrode/DvbGuSV
credit/dE7lS
crick/DSMG
critic/Y8S9M
crotchet/MSZ
cur/rYgvZl7dSMV
custom/-9Mr8S+
damn/lDGkS7nR
dear/TPYZSM
decamp/DGL
decimal/8Y-SM
decode/SMB
deduct/b
Delmer/M
depart/LG
depend/lGDSBk
deplore/klDGSR
depress/bvkV
derange/L
descend/b
detect/DGSBVl
devil/DLyMGS
dew/ZGSM
diagonal/M+8SY
diffuse/PSvYRDGubxV
digit/-9S8M
discern/LbkSGDR
discount/MRB
discuss/7R
disembarrass/DGL
disgruntle/LSDG
dismiss/bvR
distinguish/S7DlG
drag/DMZSGBR
drama/98-SM
drink/7SGRM
Dulera/M
economy/839wWS-M1
edge/DZMGRpSJ
editorial/389SY
elope/LSDGR
emplace/LSGD
encash/SGLDB
enchant/EGLSD
endear/LkDGSr
energy/SM8-9
engraft/SGDJL
ennoble/LDSGr
ensoul/SGDL
entitle/SDLG
entwine/SDGL
envy/MRS7lDkG
epitome/-98MS
equalitarian/SM
equate/DGBSnM
eras/7g
escheat/SGDML
eulogy/938SM
exaggerator/SMZ
excerpt/RGDSMb
excise/GDSMNBX
expand/BDRXVNvGSu
expanse/SDMGb
export/DRGBnMS
extempore/89-S
external/3-8Y9SM
f/F7
factor/8+d-MS
fall/RbMGS
fashion/RSMDl7G
fecund/ng
fern/SZMá
fertile/P-89Y
fictional/8-
filopodium/M
fish/Syz2MGZRDBá
fleur/SMZ
flex/SGDMb
folks/Z2
foresee/BGRS
foretell/GRS7
formal/89P3-
furze/MSZ
ganoid/MS
garnish/LSDGM
general/P3+-SM
generalize/lR
ginger/ZYSdM
gore/SMDGJZ
greenbottle/SM
grove/MSRZ
guess/DRG7SM
gull/SDMbGY
habit/7ndgSM
heatwave/SM
hoar/MZ2
hot-swap/DGB
hunk/MZS
hypothesis/d8rM9S
ideal/S-893M
identify/SlDnRBG
idol/S-89M
immerse/SNbDGXr
impeach/LR7
imperfect/SgVP
impregnate/DBSGn
impugn/RBGSLD
incrust/DGSL
incur/GS7lD
individual/Y38-9MS
induce/nRuDLGVSbv
infall/GMSb
infuse/Rb
ingest/DGbVS
inhabit/7d
initial/YSD98-GM
ink/GRZMSD
inst/g
intellect/MSb
interconvert/DGSb
intern/MoxDLG3S
internal/P9S8-
international/S-83M
interoperate/BDNSG
invert/MRGSDb
inviolate/PYB
isotherm/MSOo
item/98-SM
kinaesthetics/M	Noun: uncountable
kink/MGDZSz
knowledge/BSlM
laugh/p7RSlGkDJM
leg/omDSbM2pGZn
lepta/M
like/DGE7S
limit/rndpMSgl
lion/SM-
liquid/9n8YP-SM
locomotor/Z
love/pMk7RSYlDG
Luxenbourg/M
machine/nyGS3MDBá
magnet/W8-SM+1
manoeuvre/SBMGDJr
market/g7rSMdJ
material/39S-MP8
McCartney/M
measure/rLSpMhlGD
merchant/BSM
microwave/G7DSM
mildew/ZGDSM
military/SM-3Y
miniature/G3S8M-D
miser/ZY7l
Miyako/M
mobile/I-+98
modern/S8YTP9-
moral/-83SM
musk/ZM2
natural/MS38-
négligé/SM
nett/SJ7r
normal/8+-SM
novel/S3M-Y~
objection/lSM7
oligarch/wWMZé
Olympia/M
optimum/8-9SM
orthogonal/8-Y
overachieve/GrLS
palate/SgoM
par/dDGS7
parametrize/SGBnD
pardon/prgl7dSM
part/rYb
pastille/MS
patron/98-YMSO
philosophy/w1W8S9M
photoautotroph/WZ
ping/SGDR7M
Piscis/M
pleasure/SlDGM
polar/-8S
polymer/W8-MS
pork/RSZM
port/lDMYSBRG
predict/DSvBGlV
present/MnLYRS7xlDG3
pressure/M8-9GDS
priority/8-9SM
probe/RBnDGlSM
produce/b
profit/Mpgdl7S
proprietary/SM
proselyte/MG9DS
quake/DZGMSk
quantum/8M-9
quench/DR7SGpM
ratify/BSRnDG
rational/SMY8-39
read/2JlRzGB
real/SMT3+9-8Y
rearrange/L
reason/rlp7dSM
reclaim/7
reconfigure/B
recover/gdZ7
redeem/D7R
redingote/MS
redoubt/Dl
reduce/SbDGRnV
refine/LR
remark/SMDGl7
remedy/7SGMoDpO
remiss/YVPb
rent/DMRSGpB
reproduce/ubvV
reselect/7
resolve/BD
restrictor/SMZ
retire/kLOR
reverse/rYbGM
right/pRP7DjG36SY~
rise/bGJS
Rushdie/M
sauce/r2ZMGSp
scrutiny/S98M-
season/dlS7Mo
seize/SGDB
sense/DGnSpMb
sensor/SM
sentimental/3-8Y9
serial/3-8SYM
ship/D4ALGS
shit/pDZGSMR!
sing/MRS7GDk
slither/dSZM
soapbox/SM
solemn/-8TY
soot/DMZ
spell/RG7JDSM
stable/DGZ
stage/SZBM2R
sterile/Y8-9
strikeout/SM
subside/-8DZG9S
sue/R7SGD
sugar/dMpSZ
suit/MldSg7
summary/S98MYP
suspense/6Mb
switch/BDMRGS
synchrony/89-
tantalum/-98M
tax/rD7GJMnlkSp
technology/3wSM1
terror/983-SMp
theory/-893MS
think/RJ7GS
thorn/SZ2MpDá
transfer/DR7SGMg
Transkei/M
translate/DgGnS
transplant/7nSMr
twang/DGZSM
unread/ZB2l
upgrade/7nGSDM
us/rS7dgl
utile/-8
vapour/~Jr7pZDGSMká
vary/hkGlSBD
Vella/M
vend/SbDG
verify/SGDRnBl
victim/98-MpS
vocal/98-3SMY
Whiggery/M	Noun: uncountable
zipx/M
